Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin 180 DEGREES; YOUTH SHELTER FACILITY.new text end new text begin $856,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to 180 Degrees to construct, furnish, and equip improvements necessary for renovation of a youth shelter facility located at 1101 Washington Memorial Drive in the city of St. Cloud to improve program delivery onsite and provide space for a teen employment center and donation center. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end